Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,106
Interstate bridges; construction and maintenance; bidders; bond.

Any agreement made between the department and an adjoining state which authorizes the letting of construction or maintenance contracts by either the department or the adjoining state shall require the person to whom the contract is to be awarded to furnish bond, with good and sufficient sureties approved by the department, in an amount at least equal to the interests of the State of Nebraska in the contract price, conditioned upon the faithful fulfillment of the contract. In the absence of any such agreement between the department and an adjoining state, such bond shall be required of all persons awarded contracts by the department for construction or maintenance to be performed wholly within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 16, p. 639.